Missouri, session 2026, SB1443.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 620, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 620.2012, to read as
follows:
620.2012. 1. In exchange for the consideration
provided by the new tax revenues and other economic stimuli
that will be generated by the creation or retention of jobs
and the making of new capital investment in this state, a
qualified company may be eligible to receive the tax credits
described in this section if:
(1) The department makes, and the qualified company
accepts, a proposal for benefits that includes tax credits
authorized by this section; and
(2) The qualified company will expend at least fifty
million dollars in new capital investment for the project no
later than two years after the date of the notice of intent.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (29)
of subsection 1 of section 620.2005 to the contrary, a data
storage center as defined in subdivision (4) of subsection 1
of section 144.810 shall not be eligible to be a qualified

SB 1443 2
company for the purposes of the tax credits authorized under
this section.
3. A qualified company that intends to seek the
benefits authorized under this section shall submit to the
department a notice of intent. Notwithstanding the
provisions of subsection 1 of section 620.2020 to the
contrary, a notice of intent from a qualified company that
did not receive and accept a proposal of benefits for tax
credits under this section shall be ineligible for the tax
credits under this section. The department shall respond
within thirty days to a notice of intent with an approval or
a rejection, provided that the department may withhold
approval or provide a contingent approval until it is
satisfied that proper documentation of eligibility has been
provided. A failure of the department to respond within
thirty days shall not result in the notice of intent being
deemed approved.
4. The tax credits authorized by this section shall
not exceed two and one-half percent of the new capital
investment made at the project facility during the three-
year period beginning upon the date of the notice of
intent. No new capital investment incurred prior to the
date of the notice of intent shall be eligible for tax
credits under this section.
5. Tax credits authorized by this section shall be
included in and subject to the limitations on the maximum
amount of tax credits that may be authorized in a fiscal
year as provided in subdivision (1) of subsection 7 of
section 620.2020. The provisions of subsection 9 of section
620.2020 shall also apply to tax credits authorized pursuant
to this section, except that any authorization of tax
credits under this section shall expire if, within two years

SB 1443 3
from the date of the notice of intent for the project, the
qualified company has failed to meet the minimum required
new capital investment as required in subdivision (2) of
subsection 1 of this section.
6. The amount of tax credits proposed and awarded to a
qualified company under this section shall not exceed the
least amount necessary to obtain the qualified company's
commitment to initiate the project. In determining the
amount of tax credits to include in a proposal for benefits
to a qualified company under this section, the department
shall consider the following factors:
(1) The significance of the qualified company's need
for program benefits;
(2) The overall size and quality of the proposed
project, including the number of jobs created or retained,
new capital investment, proposed wages for such jobs, growth
potential of the qualified company, and similar factors;
(3) The financial stability and creditworthiness of
the qualified company;
(4) The level of economic distress in the area;
(5) An evaluation of the competitiveness of
alternative locations for the project facility, as
applicable; and
(6) The percent of local incentives committed.
7. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 3 of
section 620.2020 to the contrary, a qualified company
receiving benefits under this section shall provide an
annual report of the number of jobs created or retained, and
wage information for such jobs, new capital investment, and
such other information as may be required by the department
to document the basis for program benefits no later than
ninety days prior to the end of the qualified company's tax

SB 1443 4
year immediately following the tax year for which the
benefits provided under this section are attributed.
Failure to timely file the annual report required under this
section may result in the forfeiture of tax credits
attributable to the year for which the reporting was
required.
8. Upon approval of a notice of intent to receive tax
credits under subsection 3 of this section, the department
and the qualified company shall enter into a written
agreement covering the applicable project period. The
agreement shall specify, at a minimum:
(1) The committed number of jobs created or retained,
wages for such jobs, and new capital investment for each
year during the project period;
(2) The terms and conditions upon the issuance of tax
credits, which, notwithstanding subsection 4 of section
620.2020 to the contrary, shall be issued no sooner than
when the qualified company files its first annual report
required under subsection 3 of section 620.2020 after making
100 the minimum required new capital investment as set forth in
101 subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this section;
102 (3) Clawback provisions, as may be required by the
103 department; and
104 (4) Any other provisions the department may require.
105 9. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
106 contrary, any qualified company that is awarded tax credits
107 under this section shall not simultaneously receive benefits
108 under sections 135.100 to 135.155, 620.2010, or 620.2015 for
109 the same jobs, wages, or new capital investment that
110 qualified for tax credits under this section.
✓